New York, session 2025-2026, S9702.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general obligations law is amended by adding a new 2 section 18-202 to read as follows: 3 § 18-202. Liability for negligent supervision in cases of sexual 4 offenses. 1. For the purposes of this section, a "corporate entity" 5 shall include any foreign or domestic corporation, limited liability 6 company, limited liability partnership, or other corporate entity doing 7 business in this state. 8 2. In any civil action against a corporate entity, or any officer, 9 director, member or manager thereof, for negligent supervision of an 10 employee or agent alleged to have engaged in conduct that would consti- 11 tute a sexual offense as defined in article one hundred thirty of the 12 penal law, the plaintiff shall not be required to prove that the person 13 committing such sexual offense did so on the premises of, or with chat- 14 tels or property belonging to, the allegedly negligent corporate entity, 15 officer, director, member, or manager. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 17 pending actions and actions commenced on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05733-01-5